Missouri, session 2026, HB2515.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 142, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 142.819, to read as follows:
142.819. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Government-owned vehicles", motor vehicles owned and operated, or
leased and operated, by any state or local governmental entity, municipality, or any
other political subdivision of this state including, but not limited to, firetrucks, fire
engines, ambulances, police cars, snowplows, emergency utility or maintenance vehicles,
and any other similar vehicles;
(2) "Primarily used for public service", the political subdivision shall use at least
seventy-five percent of the mileage logged on a government-owned vehicle directly in the
performance of essential governmental functions, government purposes, or other public
service purposes.
2. Motor fuel sold and used as fuel to operate government-owned vehicles that
are primarily used for public service purposes shall be exempt from the fuel tax imposed
by this chapter.
3. The department may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2515 2
536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔